Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-405
City council; ordinances; style; publication; emergency ordinances.

The style of ordinances of a city of the first class shall be: "Be it ordained by the mayor and city council of the city of ................," and all ordinances of a general nature shall, within fifteen days after they are passed, be published in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation within the city, or in book, pamphlet, or electronic form, to be distributed or sold, as may be provided by ordinance. Every ordinance fixing a penalty or forfeiture for its violation shall, before the ordinance takes effect, be published for at least one week in the manner prescribed in this section. In cases of riots, infectious diseases, or other impending danger, or any other emergency requiring its immediate operation, such ordinance shall take effect upon the proclamation of the mayor immediately upon its first publication as provided in this section.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 47, p. 245;

R.S.1913, § 4898;

C.S.1922, § 4066;

C.S.1929, § 16-405;

R.S.1943, § 16-405;

Laws 1971, LB 282, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 74;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 26;

Laws 2021, LB159, § 4.

Publication in one regular issue of a legal newspaper in any week was sufficient notwithstanding this section and home rule charter. Skag-Way Department Stores, Inc. v. City of Grand Island, 176 Neb. 169, 125 N.W.2d 529 (1964).

One insertion in a daily paper does not meet the requirement of statute, since a publication must be continued in each issue thereof for a week. Union Pacific Railway Co. v. McNally, 54 Neb. 112, 74 N.W. 390 (1898); Union Pacific Railway Co. v. Montgomery, 49 Neb. 429, 68 N.W. 619 (1896).

One publication is sufficient if in weekly paper. State ex rel. Hahn v. Hardy, 7 Neb. 377 (1878).